West Virginia, session 2025, HB3008.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §17A-10-3c.  Additional registration fees for alternative fuel vehicles. [Repealed].  NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to repeal the section of the West Virginia code relating to additional registration fees for alternative fuel vehicles.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home